District of Columbia statutes.
50-1301.59

Provisions of chapter not to affect other policies.

(a)

This chapter shall not be held to apply to or affect policies of automobile insurance against liability which may now or hereafter be required by any other law of the District of Columbia, and such policies, if they contain an agreement or are endorsed to conform with the requirements of this chapter may be certified as proof of financial responsibility under this chapter.

(b)

This chapter shall not be held to apply to or affect policies insuring solely the insured named in the policy against liability resulting from the maintenance or use by persons in the insured’s employ or on his behalf of vehicles not owned by the insured.

History

May 25, 1954, 68 Stat. 136, ch. 222, § 59

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-459.
1973 Ed., § 40-475.